Rhode Island statutes. Title 33 Probate Practice and Procedure
Chapter 6 Proof and Construction of Wills

33-6-1.
Gifts to attesting witnesses.

If any person shall attest the execution of any will or codicil to whom any beneficial devise, legacy, estate, interest, gift, or appointment, or affecting any real or personal estate, other than and except charges and direction for the payment of any debt or debts, shall be thereby given or made, the devise, legacy, estate, interest, gift or appointment shall, so far only as concerns that person attesting the execution of the will, or codicil, or any person claiming under that person, be utterly null and void; but the person so attesting shall be admitted as a witness to prove the execution of the will, or codicil, or to prove the validity or invalidity thereof, notwithstanding the devise, legacy, estate, interest, gift, or appointment, mentioned in the will, or codicil.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 203, § 32; G.L. 1909, ch. 254, § 32; G.L. 1923, ch. 298, § 32; G.L. 1938, ch. 566, § 31; G.L. 1956, §

33-6-1

.

33-6-2.
Creditor attesting.

In case by any will or codicil any real or personal estate shall be charged with any debt or debts, and any creditor whose debt is so charged shall attest the execution of the will or codicil, the creditor, notwithstanding the charge, shall be admitted as a witness to prove the execution of the will or codicil, or to prove the validity or invalidity thereof.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 203, § 33; G.L. 1909, ch. 254, § 33; G.L. 1923, ch. 298, § 33; G.L. 1938, ch. 566, § 32; G.L. 1956, §

33-6-2

.

33-6-3.
Death of attesting beneficiary in lifetime of testator.

In case any devisee or legatee who shall attest the execution of any will or codicil which shall hereafter be made shall die in the lifetime of the testator or before the probate of the will, the devisee or legatee shall be deemed to have been a legal witness to the execution of the will or codicil within the intent of this chapter, notwithstanding the devise or legacy.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 203, § 34; G.L. 1909, ch. 254, § 34; G.L. 1923, ch. 298, § 34; G.L. 1938, ch. 566, § 33; G.L. 1956, §

33-6-3

.

33-6-4.
Executor or trustee as witness.

No person shall, on account of his or her being an executor of, or trustee under, a will, be incompetent to be admitted a witness to prove the execution of the will or codicil, or to prove the validity or invalidity thereof.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 203, § 35; G.L. 1909, ch. 254, § 35; G.L. 1923, ch. 298, § 35; G.L. 1938, ch. 566, § 34; G.L. 1956, §

33-6-4

.

33-6-5.
Construction as to real estate within state.

All questions arising as to the meaning, interpretation, or construction of a will executed outside the state, affecting real estate within this state, shall be determined according to the laws of this state.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 203, § 37; G.L. 1909, ch. 254, § 37; G.L. 1923, ch. 298, § 37; G.L. 1938, ch. 566, § 36; G.L. 1956, §

33-6-5

.

33-6-6.
Time from which will speaks.

Every will shall be construed, with reference to the real estate and personal estate comprised in it, to speak and take effect as if it had been executed immediately before the death of the testator, unless a contrary intention shall expressly appear by the will.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 203, § 6; G.L. 1909, ch. 254, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 298, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 566, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

33-6-6

.

33-6-7.
Devise without words of limitation.

Whenever any real estate shall be devised without words of limitation, the devise shall be construed to pass the fee simple, or the other whole estate or interest which the testator had power to dispose of by will in the real estate, unless a contrary intention shall appear by the will.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 203, § 14; G.L. 1909, ch. 254, § 14; G.L. 1923, ch. 298, § 14; G.L. 1938, ch. 566, § 14; G.L. 1956, §

33-6-7

.

33-6-8.
Devise to executor or trustee.

Where any real estate shall be devised to any trustee or executor, the devise shall be construed to pass the fee simple, or the other whole estate or interest which the testator had power to dispose of by will in the real estate, unless a definite term of years, absolute or determinable, or an estate of freehold, shall be thereby expressly given to him or her.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 203, § 15; G.L. 1909, ch. 254, § 15; G.L. 1923, ch. 298, § 15; G.L. 1938, ch. 566, § 15; G.L. 1956, §

33-6-8

.

33-6-9.
Gift for life with remainder to issue.

Whenever a devise or bequest is made to one for life and thereafter to his or her issue in any will hereafter made, issue shall be construed to be the children of the life tenant living at his or her death, and the lineal descendants of those children as may have then died, as tenants in common, but the descendants of any deceased child taking equally amongst them the share only which their deceased parent, if then living, would have taken.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 203, § 11; G.L. 1909, ch. 254, § 11; G.L. 1923, ch. 298, § 11; G.L. 1938, ch. 566, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

33-6-9

.

33-6-10.
Limitation on fee tail.

No person seised in fee simple shall have a right to devise any estate in fee tail for a longer time than to the children of the first devisee; and a devise for life to any person and to the children or issue generally of the devisee in fee simple, shall not vest a fee tail estate in the first devisee but an estate for life only, and the remainder shall on his or her death vest in his or her children or issue generally agreeably to the direction of the will.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 203, § 10; G.L. 1909, ch. 254, § 10; G.L. 1923, ch. 298, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 566, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

33-6-10

.

33-6-11.
Death of devisee in tail in lifetime of testator.

Where any person to whom real estate shall be devised an estate tail, or an estate in quasi entail, shall die in the lifetime of the testator, leaving issue who would be inheritable under the entail, and any issue shall be living at the time of the death of the testator, the devise shall not lapse but shall take effect as if the death of the devisee had happened immediately after the death of the testator, unless a contrary intention shall appear by the will.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 203, § 8; G.L. 1909, ch. 254, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 298, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 566, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

33-6-11

.

33-6-12.
Commencement of income estate.

When an annuity or the use, rent, income, or interest of property, real or personal, is given by a will, or by an instrument in the nature of a will, to or in trust for the benefit of a person for life or until the happening of a contingent event, that person shall be entitled to receive and enjoy the same from and after the death of the testator, unless it is otherwise provided in the will or instrument.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 203, § 38; G.L. 1909, ch. 254, § 38; G.L. 1923, ch. 298, § 38; G.L. 1938, ch. 566, § 37; G.L. 1956, §

33-6-12

.

33-6-13.
Apportionment on termination of income estate.

If the person entitled to an annuity, use, rent, income or interest dies, or if a contingent event happens, before the termination of a year from a time when the whole of the annual amount for the preceding year has become due, the annuity, use, rent, income or interest, for the then current year, shall be apportioned, and that person or his or her representatives shall be entitled to receive a proportionate part thereof, unless it is otherwise provided in the will or instrument.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 203, § 39; G.L. 1909, ch. 254, § 39; G.L. 1923, ch. 298, § 39; G.L. 1938, ch. 566, § 38; G.L. 1956, §

33-6-13

.

33-6-14.
Suit for recovery of income from executor.

No suit for the recovery of an annuity or interest shall be brought against an executor until the expiration of one year after his or her giving bond for the discharge of his or her trust.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 203, § 40; G.L. 1909, ch. 254, § 40; G.L. 1923, ch. 298, § 40; G.L. 1938, ch. 566, § 39; G.L. 1956, §

33-6-14

.

33-6-15.
Interest on general pecuniary legacies.

Unless otherwise provided in the will, a general pecuniary legatee shall not be entitled to interest on his or her legacy for the period of one year from and after the death of the testator. After the one year period the executor or administrator with the will annexed, unless otherwise provided by the testator, shall not be chargeable for more interest on any pecuniary legacy than the entire net income actually earned by the legacy if and when left in the investment as made by the testator, or actually invested in notes secured by mortgage upon real estate situated in this state, or in the bonds of any city or town in this state, or deposited in any savings bank in this state, or in the participation account of any trust company in this state, or invested in any other manner specially ordered by the probate court. But if otherwise invested, the legacy shall bear interest at the rate of six percent (6%) per annum or such larger rate as the same may have earned; provided, however, that nothing herein contained shall authorize executors or administrators to make investments other than trustees are allowed to make, unless specially authorized by the will to do so.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 203, § 41; G.L. 1909, ch. 254, § 41; G.L. 1923, ch. 298, § 41; G.L. 1938, ch. 566, § 40; G.L. 1956, §

33-6-15

.

33-6-16.
Life estate or term for years in property consumed by use.

When a testator shall by will bequeath the use for life or for a term of years of any livestock, provisions, wearing apparel, or other personal property, which will necessarily be consumed by using, the bequest shall give to the legatee an absolute estate in the property so bequeathed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 203, § 44; G.L. 1909, ch. 254, § 44; G.L. 1923, ch. 298, § 44; G.L. 1938, ch. 566, § 43; G.L. 1956, §

33-6-16

.

33-6-17.
General devises and bequests.

A general devise of the real estate of the testator, or of the real estate of the testator in any place or in the occupation of any person mentioned in his or her will, or otherwise described in a general manner, shall be construed to include any real estate or any real estate to which the description shall extend, as the case may be, which he or she may have power to appoint in any manner he or she may think proper, and shall operate as an execution of such power, unless a contrary intention shall appear by the will. In like manner, a bequest of the personal estate of the testator or any bequest of personal property described in a general manner shall be construed to include any personal estate or any personal estate to which the description shall extend, as the case may be, which he or she may have power to appoint in any manner he or she may think proper, and shall operate as an execution of such power, unless a contrary intention shall appear by the will.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 203, § 9; G.L. 1909, ch. 254, § 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 298, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 566, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

33-6-17

.

33-6-18.
Devise of lands of which testator is not seised.

When a person devises lands of which he or she is not seised, but in which he or she has a right of entry, or when a testator after making a will is disseised of lands devised by the will, the lands shall nevertheless pass to the devisee in like manner as they would have descended to the testator’s heirs if he or she had died intestate; and the devisee shall have the like remedy for the recovery of the land as the heirs might have had.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 203, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 254, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 298, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 566, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

33-6-18

.

33-6-19.
Substitution of issue for beneficiary predeceasing testator.

When any person to whom any real or personal estate shall be devised or bequeathed for any estate or interest not determinable at or before the death of that person, shall die in the lifetime of the testator, leaving issue, and any issue of that person shall be living at the time of the death of the testator, such devise or bequest shall not lapse, but shall take effect and operate as a devise or bequest from the testator to that issue, in such proportions as the estate of the devisee or legatee would go to them had he or she died intestate immediately after the death of the testator, unless a contrary intention shall appear by the will.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 203, § 31; G.L. 1909, ch. 254, § 31; G.L. 1923, ch. 298, § 31; G.L. 1938, ch. 566, § 30; G.L. 1956, §

33-6-19

.

33-6-20.
Devisee or legatee predeceased without issue.

Unless a contrary intention shall appear by the will, such real estate or interest therein as shall be comprised or intended to be comprised in any devise contained in the will, which shall fail or be void by reason of the death of the devisee in the lifetime of the testator without leaving issue of the devisee living at the time of the testator’s death, or by reason of the devise being contrary to law or otherwise incapable of taking effect, shall be included in the residuary devise, if any, contained in the will. If a residuary devisee or legatee dies before the testator without leaving issue living at the time of the testator’s death, and if there be other residuary devisees or legatees named in the will in the same residuary clause, the other residuary devisees or legatees named in that clause, whether a class or not, shall take at the testator’s death the share of the residuary devisee or legatee so dying in like proportions as their shares bear one to another as expressed in the will under the residuary clause.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 203, § 7; G.L. 1909, ch. 254, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 298, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 566, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

33-6-20

.

33-6-21, 33-6-22.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 203, § 12; G.L. 1909, ch. 254, §§ 12, 21; G.L. 1923, ch. 298, §§ 12, 21; G.L. 1938, ch. 566, §§ 12, 21; P.L. 1942, ch. 1119, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1995, ch. 323, § 25, effective July 5, 1995.

33-6-23.
Pretermitted issue.

When a testator omits to provide in his or her will for any child of his or hers born after the execution of his or her will, either during his or her lifetime or after his or her death, or for any issue of a deceased child of his or hers dying after the execution of his or her will, or for any issue born after the execution of his or her will of a deceased child of his or hers dying before the will’s execution, that child or issue shall take the same share of the testator’s estate as that child or issue would have been entitled to if the testator had died intestate, unless it appears that the omission was intentional and not occasioned by accident or mistake. The term “will”, as used in this section, shall be deemed to include the testator’s will and all codicils thereto effective at the testator’s death; and the term “the execution of his or her will” shall be deemed, in a case in which there is a codicil or codicils, to refer to the execution of the latest codicil effective at the testator’s death.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 203, §§ 22, 23; G.L. 1909, ch. 254, §§ 22, 23; G.L. 1923, ch. 298, §§ 22, 23; P.L. 1931, ch. 1754, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 566, § 22; G.L. 1956, §

33-6-23

.

33-6-24.
Apportionment of share taken by pretermitted child.

When a posthumous child, or a child, or the issue of a child, omitted in the will, takes under the provisions of §

33-6-23

a portion of the estate of a testator, that portion shall be taken equally from all the devisees and legatees in proportion to the value of what they respectively receive under the will, unless in consequence of a specific devise or legacy, or of some other provision of the will, a different apportionment is found necessary in order to give effect to the testator’s intention regarding that part of his or her estate which passes by his or her will.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 203, § 24; G.L. 1909, ch. 254, § 24; G.L. 1923, ch. 298, § 24; P.L. 1931, ch. 1754, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 566, § 23; G.L. 1956, §

33-6-24

.

33-6-25.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 203, § 25; G.L. 1909, ch. 254, § 25; G.L. 1923, ch. 298, § 25; G.L. 1938, ch. 566, § 24; Repealed by P.L. 1995, ch. 323, § 25, effective July 5. 1995.

33-6-26.
Intent of testator as to apportionment of debts.

In case the testator, by making a specific devise or bequest, has virtually exempted a devisee or legatee from liability to contribute with the others for the payment of debts, or if by any other provisions in his or her will he or she has prescribed or required an appropriation of his or her estate different from that prescribed in §

33-6-25

, his or her property shall be appropriated and applied in conformity with the will, so far as such appropriation and application can be made without affecting the liability of his or her whole estate for the payment of his or her debts and the charges of settling his or her estate.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 203, § 26; G.L. 1909, ch. 254, § 26; G.L. 1923, ch. 298, § 26; G.L. 1938, ch. 566, § 25; G.L. 1956, §

33-6-26

.

33-6-27.
Contribution by pretermitted issue to payment of debts.

When a posthumous child, or a child, or the issue of a child, omitted in the testator’s will, takes under §

33-6-23

a portion of the estate of a testator, that portion of the estate shall, for all purposes of §§

33-6-25

and

33-6-26

, be considered as if it had been devised or bequeathed to that child or other descendant; and he or she shall be bound to contribute with the devisees and legatees, and shall be entitled to claim contribution from them, as provided in §§

33-6-25

and

33-6-26

.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 203, § 27; G.L. 1909, ch. 254, § 27; G.L. 1923, ch. 298, § 27; P.L. 1931, ch. 1754, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 566, § 26; G.L. 1956, §

33-6-27

.

33-6-28.
Death or insolvency of beneficiary liable to contribution for debts.

When a person liable to contribute according to the provisions of §§

33-6-25

to

33-6-27

is insolvent or unable to pay his or her just proportion of the contribution required, the other persons liable to contribute shall be severally liable for the loss occasioned by the insolvency, each one in proportion to the value of the property received by him or her from the estate of the deceased; and if a person so liable dies without having paid his or her proportion, his or her executors and administrators shall be liable therefor in like manner as if it had been his or her proper debt and to the extent to which he or she would have been liable if living.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 203, § 28; G.L. 1909, ch. 254, § 28; G.L. 1923, ch. 298, § 28; G.L. 1938, ch. 566, § 27; G.L. 1956, §

33-6-28

.

33-6-29.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 203, § 29; G.L. 1909, ch. 254, § 29; G.L. 1923, ch. 298, § 29; G.L. 1938, ch. 566, § 28; Repealed by P.L. 1995, ch. 323, § 25, effective July 5, 1995.

33-6-30.
Partial intestacy.

All real and personal property, not devised or bequeathed in the last will and testament of any person shall be distributed in the same manner as if the person had died intestate.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 203, § 30; G.L. 1909, ch. 254, § 30; G.L. 1923, ch. 298, § 30; G.L. 1938, ch. 566, § 29; G.L. 1956, §

33-6-30

.

Partial Intestacy.

A will which is not ambiguous will be given effect even though it does not dispose completely of the interest owned by the testator or testatrix in all of the property in question. Caramatro v. Caramatro,

78 R.I. 402

, 82 A.2d 849,

1951 R.I. LEXIS 92

(1951).

33-6-31.
Passage of title by will — Recording.

Title to real or personal property shall pass by will when the will has been finally proved; provided, however, that title to real estate situated in any town or city of this state other than that in which the will is proved shall not pass by will for the purpose of conveyance by the devisee until, in addition to probate, a copy of the will as proved, duly certified by the probate clerk, is recorded in the records of land evidence in that other town or city. Any foreign will shall be recorded as provided in §§

33-7-18

—

33-7-22

, and when finally allowed, shall operate to pass title to all lands in that town or city where the will is duly recorded, and in any other town or city in which a duly certified copy thereof has been recorded in the records of land evidence in that town or city and not otherwise; provided, however, that when any will is duly proved, or proved and recorded, title to lands as devised thereby shall relate back to the date of the death of the testator.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 203, § 42; C. P. A. 1905, § 1140; G.L. 1909, ch. 254, § 42; G.L. 1923, ch. 298, § 42; G.L. 1938, ch. 566, § 41; G.L. 1956, §

33-6-31

.

33-6-32.
Filing of original wills.

Original wills shall be kept on file in the probate court where they were proved, and shall only be taken from the files by order of the court or under the provisions of statutes now or hereafter in force.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 203, § 43; G.L. 1909, ch. 254, § 43; G.L. 1923, ch. 298, § 43; G.L. 1938, ch. 566, § 42; G.L. 1956, §

33-6-32

.

33-6-33.
Gifts to trustee of existing trust.

A devise, bequest, or appointment in a will validly executed under the provisions of this chapter may be made in form or substance to the trustee or trustees of a trust in writing executed by the testator or any other person or persons prior to and in existence at the time of the execution of the will, and identified in the will, whatever the size or character of the corpus of the trust (including an unfounded life insurance trust, although the settlor has reserved any or all rights of ownership in the insurance policies). A devise, bequest, or appointment shall not be invalid because the trust is amendable or revocable, or both, by the settlor or any other person or persons; nor because the trust instrument or any amendment thereto was not executed in the manner required for wills; nor because the trust was amended after the execution of the will. Unless the will provides otherwise, the property so devised, bequeathed or appointed shall not be deemed held under a testamentary trust, but shall become and be a part of the principal of the trust to which it is given to be administered and disposed of in accordance with the terms and provisions of the trust to which it is given, including any amendments, as it appears in writing at the death of the testator. In the event of complete termination of the trust prior to the testator’s death, the devise or bequest shall lapse and the appointment fail unless the will directs otherwise.

History of Section.

G.L., §

33-6-33

, as enacted by P.L. 1959, ch. 74, § 1.